src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Rel_мс-п_[п_b]
+Det+Rel: LF_end ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]
+Det: LF_end ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]_ни
+Det+Neg: LF_end ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]-либо
+Det+Indef: LF_end-либо ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]-нибудь
+Det+Indef: LF_end-нибудь ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]-то
+Det+Def: LF_end-то ;

LEXICON Dem_мс-п_[п_b]-то
+Det+Dem: LF_end-то ;

LEXICON мс_кто ! TODO FIX How to tag animacy for кто что and derivatives
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Nom ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Acc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Gen ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Loc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Dat ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Ins ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Nom ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Acc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Gen ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Loc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Dat ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_кто_ни ! TODO FIX How to tag animacy for кто что and derivatives
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Nom ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Acc ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Gen ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Loc ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Dat ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_кто_Nom
+Msc+Sg+Nom:кто́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:кто́ # ;
+Pl+Nom:кто́ # ;
LEXICON мс_кто_Acc
+Msc+Sg+Acc:кого́ # ;
LEXICON мс_кто_Gen
+Msc+Sg+Gen:кого́ # ;
LEXICON мс_кто_Loc
+Msc+Sg+Loc:ко́м # ;
LEXICON мс_кто_Dat
+Msc+Sg+Dat:кому́ # ;
LEXICON мс_кто_Ins
+Msc+Sg+Ins:ке́м # ;

LEXICON мс_кто-либо
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Nom:кто́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Fem+Sg+Nom:кто́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom:кто́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Acc:кого́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Gen:кого́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Loc:ко́м-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Dat:кому́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Ins:ке́м-либо # ;

LEXICON мс_кто-нибудь
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Nom:кто́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Fem+Sg+Nom:кто́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom:кто́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Acc:кого́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Gen:кого́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Loc:ко́м-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Dat:кому́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg+Ins:ке́м-нибудь # ;

LEXICON мс_кто-то
+Pron+Def+Msc+Sg+Nom:кто́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Fem+Sg+Nom:кто́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Pl+Nom:кто́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Msc+Sg+Acc:кого́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Msc+Sg+Gen:кого́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Msc+Sg+Loc:ко́м-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Msc+Sg+Dat:кому́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Msc+Sg+Ins:ке́м-то # ;

LEXICON мс_некто
+Pron+Def+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ; ! TODO FIX what about Fem, Pl?

LEXICON мс_некого
+Pron+Pred: мс_некого_Acc ;
+Pron+Pred: мс_некого_Gen ;
+Pron+Pred: мс_некого_Loc ;
+Pron+Pred: мс_некого_Dat ;
+Pron+Pred: мс_некого_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_некого_Acc
+Acc:кого # ;

LEXICON мс_некого_Gen
+Gen:кого # ;

LEXICON мс_некого_Loc
+Loc:ком # ;

LEXICON мс_некого_Dat
+Dat:кому # ;

LEXICON мс_некого_Ins
+Ins:кем # ;

LEXICON мс_что
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Nom ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Acc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Gen ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Loc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Dat ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Ins ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Nom ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Acc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Gen ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Loc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Dat ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_что_ни
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Nom ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Acc ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Gen ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Loc ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Dat ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_что_Nom
+Neu+Sg+Nom:что́ # ;
LEXICON мс_что_Acc
+Neu+Sg+Acc:что́ # ;
LEXICON мс_что_Gen
+Neu+Sg+Gen:чего́ # ;
LEXICON мс_что_Loc
+Neu+Sg+Loc:чём # ;
LEXICON мс_что_Dat
+Neu+Sg+Dat:чему́ # ;
LEXICON мс_что_Ins
+Neu+Sg+Ins:че́м # ;

LEXICON мс_что-либо
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Nom:что́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Acc:что́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Gen:чего́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Loc:чём-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Dat:чему́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Ins:че́м-либо # ;

LEXICON мс_что-нибудь
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Nom:что́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Acc:что́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Gen:чего́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Loc:чём-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Dat:чему́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg+Ins:че́м-нибудь # ;

LEXICON мс_что-то
+Pron+Def+Neu+Sg+Nom:что́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Neu+Sg+Acc:что́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Neu+Sg+Gen:чего́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Neu+Sg+Loc:чём-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Neu+Sg+Dat:чему́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Neu+Sg+Ins:че́м-то # ;

LEXICON мс_нечто
+Pron+Def+Neu+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Pron+Def+Neu+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON мс_нечего
+Pron+Pred: мс_нечего_Gen ;
+Pron+Pred: мс_нечего_Loc ;
+Pron+Pred: мс_нечего_Dat ;
+Pron+Pred: мс_нечего_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_нечего_Acc
+Acc:что # ;
LEXICON мс_нечего_Gen
+Gen:чего # ;
LEXICON мс_нечего_Loc
+Loc:чем # ;
LEXICON мс_нечего_Dat
+Dat:чему # ;
LEXICON мс_нечего_Ins
+Ins:чем # ;

LEXICON мс_другдруга
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Acc ;
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Gen ;
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Loc ;
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Dat ;
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_другдруга_Acc
+Acc:дру́га # ;
LEXICON мс_другдруга_Gen
+Gen:дру́га # ;
LEXICON мс_другдруга_Loc
+Loc:дру́ге # ;
LEXICON мс_другдруга_Dat
+Dat:дру́гу # ;
LEXICON мс_другдруга_Ins
+Ins:дру́гом # ;

LEXICON мс_я
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:я́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:меня́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen:меня́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Loc:мне́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat:мне́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins:мно́й # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins+Use/NG:мно́ю # ;

LEXICON мс_ты
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:ты́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:тебя́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen:тебя́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Loc:тебе́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat:тебе́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins:тобо́й # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins+Use/NG:тобо́ю # ;

LEXICON мс_он
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Nom:о́н # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Acc:его́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Gen:его́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Loc:нём # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Dat:ему́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Ins:и́м # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Acc+PObj:него́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Gen+PObj:него́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Dat+PObj:нему́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Ins+PObj:ни́м # ;

LEXICON мс_оно
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Nom:оно́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Acc:его́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Gen:его́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Loc:нём # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Dat:ему́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Ins:и́м # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Acc+PObj:него́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Gen+PObj:него́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Dat+PObj:нему́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Ins+PObj:ни́м # ;

LEXICON мс_она
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Nom:она́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Acc:её # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Gen:её # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Loc:не́й # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Dat:е́й # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Ins:е́й # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Ins+Use/NG:е́ю # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Acc+PObj:неё # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Gen+PObj:неё # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Dat+PObj:не́й # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Ins+PObj:не́й # ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Ins+PObj+Use/NG:не́ю # ;

LEXICON мс_мы
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:мы́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:на́с # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen:на́с # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Loc:на́с # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat:на́м # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ins:на́ми # ;

LEXICON мс_вы
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:вы́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:ва́с # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen:ва́с # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Loc:ва́с # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat:ва́м # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ins:ва́ми # ;

LEXICON мс_они
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:они́ # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:и́х # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen:и́х # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Loc:ни́х # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat:и́м # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ins:и́ми # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc+PObj:ни́х # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen+PObj:ни́х # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat+PObj:ни́м # ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ins+PObj:ни́ми # ;

LEXICON мс_себя
+Pron+Refl+Nom:себя́ # ;
+Pron+Refl+Acc:себя́ # ;
+Pron+Refl+Gen:себя́ # ;
+Pron+Refl+Loc:себе́ # ;
+Pron+Refl+Dat:себе́ # ;
+Pron+Refl+Ins:собо́й # ;
+Pron+Refl+Ins+Use/NG:собо́ю # ;

LEXICON мс_столько
+Pron+Nom:о # ;
+Pron+Acc:о # ;
+Pron+Gen:ого # ;
+Pron+Loc:ом # ;
+Pron+Dat:ому # ;
+Pron+Ins:им # ;

LEXICON мс_мо_[п_a]_SgOnly
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Nom:%>ый # ;
+Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс_с_[п_a]_SgOnly
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>ое # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>ое # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс_жо_[п_a]_SgOnly
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>ая # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>ую # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%>ою # ;
