src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun
я¹: мс_я ; ! мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В._меня/,_Д.,_П._мне,_Т._мной_//_мно/ю ;
ты: мс_ты ; ! мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В._тебя/,_Д.,_П._тебе/,_Т._тобо/й_//_тобо/ю ;
он¹: мс_он ; ! мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В._его/_(с_предл._него/),_Д._ему/_(с_предл._нему/),_Т._им_(с_предл._ним),_П._нём ;
оно: мс_оно ; ! мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В._его/_(с_предл._него/),_Д._ему/_(с_предл._нему/),_Т._им_(с_предл._ним),_П._нём; ;
она: мс_она ; ! мс_%tr%_Р.,_В._её_(с_предл._неё),_Д._ей_(с_предл._ней),_Т._е/ю_(с_предл._не/ю)_//_ей_(с_предл._ней),_П._ней ;
мы: мс_мы ; ! мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В.,_П._нас,_Д._нам,_Т._на/ми ;
вы: мс_вы ; ! мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В.,_П._вас,_Д._вам,_Т._ва/ми ;
они: мс_они ; ! мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В._их_(с_предл._них),_Д._им_(с_предл._ним),_Т._и/ми_(с_предл._ни/ми),_П._них ;
себя: мс_себя ; ! мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В._себя/,_Д.,_П._себе/,_Т._собо/й_//_собо/ю;_И._нет ;
кое-кто:ко̀е- мс_кто ; ! § 12
кой-кто:ко̀й- мс_кто ; ! § 12
никто:ни мс_кто_ни ; ! § 12
некого:не́ мс_некого ; ! предикативное_мс_%tr%:_Р.,_В._не/кого,_Д._не/кому,_Т._не/кем,_П._не/_о_ком_(не/_на_ком_и_т._д.);_И._нет;_§ 12 ;
кто-либо: мс_кто-либо ;
кто-нибудь: мс_кто-нибудь ;
кто-то: мс_кто-то ;
некто:не́кто мс_некто ;
кое-что:ко̀е- мс_что ; ! § 12
кой-что:ко̀й- мс_что ; ! § 12
ничто:ни мс_что_ни ; ! § 12
нечего¹:не́ мс_нечего ; ! предикативное_мс_%tr%:_Р._не/чего,_Д._не/чему,_Т._не/чем,_П._не/_о_чем_(не/_на_чем_и_т._д.);_И._нет;_В._возможен_только_при_употреблении_с_предлогом,_напр._не/_на_что,_не/_во_что,_не/_за_что;_§ 12 ;
что-либо: мс_что-либо ;
что-нибудь: мс_что-нибудь ;
что-то¹: мс_что-то ;
нечто:не́что мс_нечто ;
столько:сто́льк мс_столько ; ! Р._сто/льк|ого,_Д._ому,_Т._им,_П._ом,_В.=И.
каждый:ка́жд мс_мо_[п_a]_SgOnly ; ! склоняется_как_мо_ед._от_мс-п_ка/ждый
немногое:немно́г мс_с_[п_a]_SgOnly ; ! склоняется_как_с_ед._от_немно/гий
каждая:ка́жд мс_жо_[п_a]_SgOnly ; ! склоняется_как_жо_ед._от_ка/ждый
друг% друга:дру̀г%  мс_другдруга ; ! см._стр._66_и § 12
каковой:каков Rel_мс-п_[п_b] ;
другой:друг мс-п_[п_b] ;
какой:как Rel_мс-п_[п_b] ;
кой-какой:ко̀й-как мс-п_[п_b] ; ! § 12
никакой:никак мс-п_[п_b]_ни ; ! § 12
какой-либо:как мс-п_[п_b]-либо ;
какой-нибудь:как мс-п_[п_b]-нибудь ;
какой-то:как мс-п_[п_b]-то ;
такой-то:так Dem_мс-п_[п_b]-то ;
путём+Pr#кое-кто+Pron+Indef:ко̀е% путём%  мс_кто_Gen ;
по+Pr#кое-кто+Pron+Indef:ко̀е% по%  мс_кто_Loc ;
о+Pr#кой-кто+Pron+Indef:ко̀й% о%  мс_кто_Acc ;
вокруг+Pr#кой-кто+Pron+Indef:ко̀й% вокру́г%  мс_кто_Gen ;
при+Pr#кой-кто+Pron+Indef:ко̀й% при%  мс_кто_Loc ;
благодаря+Pr#кой-кто+Pron+Indef:ко̀й% благодаря́%  мс_кто_Dat ;
перед+Pr#кой-кто+Pron+Indef:ко̀й% перед%  мс_кто_Ins ;
вокруг+Pr#кой-что+Pron+Indef:ко̀й% вокру́г%  мс_что_Gen ;
при+Pr#кой-что+Pron+Indef:ко̀й% при%  мс_что_Loc ;
с+Pr#никто+Pron+Neg:ни% с%  мс_кто_Acc ;
сообразно+Pr#никто+Pron+Neg:ни% сообра́зно%  мс_кто_Dat ;
по-над+Pr#никто+Pron+Neg:ни% по-над%  мс_кто_Ins ;
с+Pr#ничто+Pron+Neg:ни% со%  мс_что_Acc ;
сообразно+Pr#ничто+Pron+Neg:ни% сообра́зно%  мс_что_Dat ;
по-над+Pr#ничто+Pron+Neg:ни% по-над%  мс_что_Ins ;
сквозь+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% сквозь%  мс_некого_Acc ;
чрез+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% чрез%  мс_некого_Acc ;
промежду+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% проме́жду%  мс_некого_Gen ;
путём+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% путём%  мс_некого_Gen ;
на+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% на%  мс_некого_Loc ;
по+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% по%  мс_некого_Loc ;
сообразно+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% сообра́зно%  мс_некого_Dat ;
по+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% по%  мс_некого_Dat ;
перед+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% перед%  мс_некого_Ins ;
по-над+Pr#некого+Pron+Neg:не́% по-над%  мс_некого_Ins ;
чрез+Pr#нечего+Pron+Neg:не́% чрез%  мс_нечего_Acc ;
путём+Pr#нечего+Pron+Neg:не́% путём%  мс_нечего_Gen ;
по+Pr#нечего+Pron+Neg:не́% по%  мс_нечего_Loc ;
по+Pr#нечего+Pron+Neg:не́% по%  мс_нечего_Dat ;
по-над+Pr#нечего+Pron+Neg:не́% по-над%  мс_нечего_Ins ;
чрез+Pr#друг% друга+Pron+Recip:дру̀г% чрез%  мс_другдруга_Acc ;
путём+Pr#друг% друга+Pron+Recip:дру̀г% путём%  мс_другдруга_Gen ;
по+Pr#друг% друга+Pron+Recip:дру̀г% по%  мс_другдруга_Loc ;
по+Pr#друг% друга+Pron+Recip:дру̀г% по%  мс_другдруга_Dat ;
по-над+Pr#друг% друга+Pron+Recip:дру̀г% по-над%  мс_другдруга_Ins ;
